District of Columbia statutes.
38-771.03

Authorized personnel; responsibilities.

(a)

Authorized personnel shall:

(1)

Before the administration of a Districtwide assessment:

(A)

Complete testing integrity training, as developed by OSSE; and

(B)

Sign a testing integrity and security agreement, as developed and distributed by OSSE;

(2)

Immediately report any breach of testing security to the school’s test monitor, the LEA’s test integrity coordinator, or OSSE;

(3)

Cooperate with OSSE in any investigation concerning the administration of a Districtwide assessment;

(4)

Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, be prohibited from:

(A)

Photocopying, or in any way reproducing, or disclosing secure test items or other materials related to Districtwide assessments;

(B)

Reviewing, reading, or looking at test items or student responses before, during, or after administering the Districtwide assessment, unless specifically permitted in the test administrator’s manual;

(C)

Assisting students in any way with answers to test questions using verbal or nonverbal cues before, during, or after administering the assessment;

(D)

Altering student responses in any manner;

(E)

Altering the test procedures stated in the formal instructions accompanying the Districtwide assessments;

(F)

Allowing students to use notes, references, or other aids, unless the test administrator’s manual specifically allows;

(G)

Having in one’s personal possession secure test materials except during the scheduled testing date;

(H)

Allowing students to view or practice secure test items before or after the scheduled testing time;

(I)

Making or having in one’s possession answer keys before the administration of that Districtwide assessment; except, that it shall not be prohibited to have an answer key for a Districtwide assessment that has already been administered;

(J)

Leaving secure test materials in a non-secure location or unattended by authorized personnel; and

(K)

Using cell phones, unapproved electronics, or computer devices during the administration of a Districtwide assessment.

(b)

The failure to comply with the prohibitions set forth in subsection (a)(4) of this section shall not be considered a violation of a test security plan if the action is necessary to provide for an accommodation that is explicitly identified in a student’s IEP or an approved accommodation plan for a ELL student; provided, that any accommodation shall be limited to the eligible student or students.

History

Oct. 17, 2013, D.C. Law 20-27, § 103, 60 DCR 11120

Section References

This section is referenced in § 38-771.02.

Effect of Amendments

The 2015 amendment by D.C. Law 21- (Act 21-193) rewrote (a)(1)(B); added “and released by OSSE” in (a)(4)(I); substituted “unapproved electronics” for “cell phones, unapproved electronics, or computer devices” in (a)(4)(K); and rewrote (b).

Temporary Legislation

For temporary (225 days) amendment of this section, see § 2 of the Testing Integrity Temporary Amendment Act of 2015 (D.C. Law 21-9, June 4, 2015, 62 DCR 4572).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 2 of the Testing Integrity Emergency Amendment Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-34, Mar. 30, 2015, 62 DCR 4544, 21 DCSTAT 873).